Alaska, session 34, SB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Federal Program Match 69,695,087 69,695,087 10 Federal-Aid Aviation State 9,807,384 11 Match (HD 1-40) 12 Federal-Aid Highway State 58,276,155 13 Match (HD 1-40) 14 Other Federal Program Match 1,611,548 15 (HD 1-40) 16 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 05 1001 Constitutional Budget Reserve Fund 69,695,087 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 69,695,087 07 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 69,695,087 08 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1001 Constitutional Budget Reserve Fund 69,695,087 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 69,695,087 07 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. The appropriations made from 02 the constitutional budget reserve fund in sec. 1 of this Act are made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 03 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 04 * Sec. 5. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act are 05 for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 06 * Sec. 6. RETROACTIVITY. Sections 1 - 5 of this Act are retroactive to March 1, 2026. 07 * Sec. 7. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.